Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-436
License; multiple services or locations; effect.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 71-470, an applicant for licensure under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall obtain a separate license for each type of health care facility or health care service that the applicant seeks to operate. A single license may be issued for (a) a facility or service operating in separate buildings or structures on the same premises under one management, (b) an inpatient facility that provides services on an outpatient basis at multiple locations, or (c) a health clinic operating satellite clinics on an intermittent basis within a portion of the total geographic area served by such health clinic and sharing administration with such clinics. A single license shall be issued for a PACE center which meets the requirements for licensure established by the department pursuant to section 71-457.

(2) The department may issue one license document that indicates the various types of health care facilities or health care services for which the entity is licensed. The department may inspect any of the locations that are covered by the license. If an entity is licensed in multiple types of licensure for one location, the department shall conduct all required inspections simultaneously for all types of licensure when requested by the entity.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 36;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 43;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 72;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 13.